Maryland, session 2026, HB0872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
31–2A–08.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE SEAT PLEASANT POLICE DEPARTMENT:
(1) IN A PERMANENT FULL–TIME POSITION BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE
DATE AND WHO REMAINS A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE SEAT
PLEASANT POLICE DEPARTMENT IN A PERMANENT FULL–TIME POSITION THROUGH
THE EFFECTIVE DATE; OR
(2) IN A PERMANENT FULL–TIME POSITION AFTER THE EFFECTIVE
DATE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IF THE SEAT
PLEASANT POLICE DEPARTMENT BECOMES A PARTICIPATING GOVERNMENTAL
UNIT IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM, MEMBERSHIP IN
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM IS MANDATORY FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
– 1 –

Ch. 57 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) IF THE SEAT PLEASANT POLICE DEPARTMENT COMMENCES
PARTICIPATION IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS ENTITLED TO ELIGIBILITY SERVICE
AND CREDITABLE SERVICE IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION
SYSTEM FOR EMPLOYMENT WITH THE SEAT PLEASANT POLICE DEPARTMENT
BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –